South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S977.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 1, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-1-82. (A) If an applicant for a driver's license or permit is unable to speak and read the English language, then he may be administered the written portion of the examination in a language other than English. (B) Upon expiration of the restricted driver's license or permit issued pursuant to this section, to renew the driver's license or permit, the applicant must retake only the written examination that must be administered in English only. The applicant shall not use a translation dictionary, an electronic device, or an interpreter to assist with the administration of the reexamination. (C) This section does not apply to an applicant who is unable to speak the English language sufficiently, but is capable of reading and writing in the English language and presents the department a written statement from a physician that he has a hearing impairment that impacts his ability to speak the English language sufficiently. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----